Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NORTHERN LIGHTS EXPRESS PASSENGER RAIL; PROHIBITION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "Northern Lights Express project" means the proposed high-speed passenger rail project between the cities of Minneapolis and Duluth. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation must not expend any money for studying, planning, preliminary engineering, final design, or construction for the Northern Lights Express project. This prohibition includes grants to other entities and the expenditure of federal money for this purpose. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Metropolitan Council. new text end new text begin The Metropolitan Council must not expend any money for studying, planning, preliminary engineering, final design, or construction for the Northern Lights Express project. This prohibition includes grants to other entities and the expenditure of federal money for this purpose. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end